Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
OUTDOOR ADVERTISING

Note

Sections 445-111 to 445-121 designated as Part IV by L 1990,
c 164, §28.

§445-111 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

(1) "Outdoor advertising device" means any
device which is:

(A) A writing, picture, painting, light,
model, display, emblem, sign, or similar device situated outdoors, which is so
designed that it draws the attention of persons in any public highway, park, or
other public place to any property, services, entertainment, or amusement,
bought, sold, rented, hired, offered, or otherwise traded in by any person, or
to the place or person where or by whom such buying, selling, renting, hiring,
offering, or other trading is carried on;

(B) A sign, poster, notice, bill, or word or
words in writing situated outdoors and so designed that it draws the attention
of and is read by persons in any public highway, park, or other public place;
or

(C) A sign, writing, symbol, or emblem made
of lights, or a device or design made of lights so designed that its primary
function is not giving light, which is situated outdoors and draws the
attention of persons in any public highway, park or other public place.

(2) "Billboard" is any board, fence, or
similar structure, whether free-standing or supported by or placed against any
wall or structure, which is designed or used for the principal purpose of
having outdoor advertising devices placed, posted, or fastened upon it.

(3) Any person who, by oneself or through any agent
or independent contractor, maintains or displays any outdoor advertising
device, or any person who knowingly causes any outdoor advertising device
advertising the person's products, merchandise, or services to be displayed by
oneself or any agent or independent contractor; or any person who, being in
possession of any land, building, or part of a building, permits any outdoor
advertising device on the land, building, or part of a building, shall be
deemed to be displaying an outdoor advertising device.

(4) Any person, who, by oneself or through any agent
or independent contractor, erects or maintains a billboard or places any
outdoor advertising device upon a billboard, or any person who knowingly causes
any of the person's products, merchandise, or services to be advertised upon a
billboard by oneself or through any agent or independent contractor; or any
person who, being in possession of any land, building, or part of a building,
knowingly permits a billboard to be erected or to remain on the land, building,
or part of a building, shall be deemed to be maintaining a billboard. [L 1965,
c 233, pt of §1; Supp, §155-120; HRS §445-111; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next